public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG num
SFX A ir i/EGM [tv]eñir
SFX A ir i/EGM ensir
SFX A ir i/EGM ertir
SFX A ir i/EGM esir
SFX A ir i/EGM languir
SFX A ir i/EGM mentir
SFX A ir i/EGM parir
SFX A ir i/EGM partir
SFX A ir i/EGM salir
SFX A ir i/EGM sorbir
SFX A ir iede ertir
SFX A ir iede parir
SFX A ir iede partir
SFX A ir iede sorbir
SFX A ir iege ertir
SFX A ir iege parir
SFX A ir iege partir
SFX A ir iege sorbir
SFX A ir ion [en]guir
SFX A ir ion [ps]entir
SFX A ir ion dormir
SFX A ir ion ensir
SFX A ir ion ertir
SFX A ir ion esir
SFX A ir ion frir
SFX A ir ion mentir
SFX A ir ion morir
SFX A ir ion parir
SFX A ir ion partir
SFX A ir ion salir
SFX A ir ion servir
SFX A ir ion sorbir
SFX A ir ion vestir
SFX A ir ion/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir ione [en]guir
SFX A ir ione [ps]entir
SFX A ir ione dormir
SFX A ir ione ensir
SFX A ir ione ertir
SFX A ir ione esir
SFX A ir ione frir
SFX A ir ione mentir
SFX A ir ione morir
SFX A ir ione parir
SFX A ir ione partir
SFX A ir ione salir
SFX A ir ione servir
SFX A ir ione sorbir
SFX A ir ione vestir
SFX A ir ione/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir ionse/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir isede ertir
SFX A ir isede parir
SFX A ir isede partir
SFX A ir isede sorbir
SFX A ir isege ertir
SFX A ir isege parir
SFX A ir isege partir
SFX A ir isege sorbir
SFX A ir isen/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir isen/K [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir isen/K ertir
SFX A ir isen/K parir
SFX A ir isen/K partir
SFX A ir isen/K sorbir
SFX A ir isene ertir
SFX A ir isene parir
SFX A ir isene partir
SFX A ir isene sorbir
SFX A ir isene/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir isene/K [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir isense/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir isense/K [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir isiede ertir
SFX A ir isiede parir
SFX A ir isiede partir
SFX A ir isiede sorbir
SFX A ir isiege ertir
SFX A ir isiege parir
SFX A ir isiege partir
SFX A ir isiege sorbir
SFX A ir ision ertir
SFX A ir ision parir
SFX A ir ision partir
SFX A ir ision sorbir
SFX A ir isione ertir
SFX A ir isione parir
SFX A ir isione partir
SFX A ir isione sorbir
SFX A ir isié ertir
SFX A ir isié parir
SFX A ir isié partir
SFX A ir isié sorbir
SFX A ir ison/K ertir
SFX A ir ison/K parir
SFX A ir ison/K partir
SFX A ir ison/K sorbir
SFX A ir isone ertir
SFX A ir isone parir
SFX A ir isone partir
SFX A ir isone sorbir
SFX A ir isé/O ertir
SFX A ir isé/O parir
SFX A ir isé/O partir
SFX A ir isé/O sorbir
SFX A ir iséu/P ertir
SFX A ir iséu/P parir
SFX A ir iséu/P partir
SFX A ir iséu/P sorbir
SFX A ir iven/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir iven/K [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir ivense/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir ivense/K [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir ivié/O [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir ivié/O [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir iviéu/P [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir iviéu/P [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir ié ertir
SFX A ir ié parir
SFX A ir ié partir
SFX A ir ié sorbir
SFX A ir ié/O [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir ié/O [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir iéu/P [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir iéu/P [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir o/I languir
SFX A ir o/IJ [ps]entir
SFX A ir o/IJ [tv]eñir
SFX A ir o/IJ ensir
SFX A ir o/IJ ertir
SFX A ir o/IJ esir
SFX A ir o/IJ mentir
SFX A ir o/IJ parir
SFX A ir o/IJ partir
SFX A ir o/IJ salir
SFX A ir o/IJ sorbir
SFX A ir on/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir on/K [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir on/K [en]guir
SFX A ir on/K [ps]entir
SFX A ir on/K [tv]eñir
SFX A ir on/K dormir
SFX A ir on/K ensir
SFX A ir on/K ertir
SFX A ir on/K esir
SFX A ir on/K frir
SFX A ir on/K mentir
SFX A ir on/K morir
SFX A ir on/K parir
SFX A ir on/K partir
SFX A ir on/K salir
SFX A ir on/K servir
SFX A ir on/K sorbir
SFX A ir on/K vestir
SFX A ir one [en]guir
SFX A ir one [ps]entir
SFX A ir one [tv]eñir
SFX A ir one dormir
SFX A ir one ensir
SFX A ir one ertir
SFX A ir one esir
SFX A ir one frir
SFX A ir one mentir
SFX A ir one morir
SFX A ir one parir
SFX A ir one partir
SFX A ir one salir
SFX A ir one servir
SFX A ir one sorbir
SFX A ir one vestir
SFX A ir one/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir one/K [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir onse/K [abdfgklmnoprstuvxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir onse/K [cjñ]ir
SFX A ir sa parir
SFX A ir se parir
SFX A ir si parir
SFX A ir so/H parir
SFX A ir é/G [abcfgjknopxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir é/G [adegiptu]rir
SFX A ir é/G [ae]mir
SFX A ir é/G [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir é/G [aeiloru]tir
SFX A ir é/G [ai]nsir
SFX A ir é/G [ailoru]sir
SFX A ir é/G [aio]stir
SFX A ir é/G [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir é/G [ao]ntir
SFX A ir é/G [bklnrt]uir
SFX A ir é/G [eiou]lir
SFX A ir é/G [fiktxđ]alir
SFX A ir é/G [ir]morir
SFX A ir é/G [jl]estir
SFX A ir é/G arguir
SFX A ir é/G censir
SFX A ir é/G desavir
SFX A ir é/G dir
SFX A ir é/G orir
SFX A ir é/G skarmir
SFX A ir é/G xmentir
SFX A ir é/GO [en]guir
SFX A ir é/GO [ps]entir
SFX A ir é/GO [tv]eñir
SFX A ir é/GO dormir
SFX A ir é/GO ensir
SFX A ir é/GO esir
SFX A ir é/GO frir
SFX A ir é/GO mentir
SFX A ir é/GO morir
SFX A ir é/GO salir
SFX A ir é/GO servir
SFX A ir é/GO vestir
SFX A ir é/O ertir
SFX A ir é/O parir
SFX A ir é/O partir
SFX A ir é/O sorbir
SFX A ir éu/P [en]guir
SFX A ir éu/P [ps]entir
SFX A ir éu/P [tv]eñir
SFX A ir éu/P dormir
SFX A ir éu/P ensir
SFX A ir éu/P ertir
SFX A ir éu/P esir
SFX A ir éu/P frir
SFX A ir éu/P mentir
SFX A ir éu/P morir
SFX A ir éu/P parir
SFX A ir éu/P partir
SFX A ir éu/P salir
SFX A ir éu/P servir
SFX A ir éu/P sorbir
SFX A ir éu/P vestir
SFX A ir í [abcdfgjklmnoprstuvxñđŧ]ir
SFX A ir í/GO [abcfgjknopxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir í/GO [adegiptu]rir
SFX A ir í/GO [ae]mir
SFX A ir í/GO [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir í/GO [aeiloru]tir
SFX A ir í/GO [ai]nsir
SFX A ir í/GO [ailoru]sir
SFX A ir í/GO [aio]stir
SFX A ir í/GO [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir í/GO [ao]ntir
SFX A ir í/GO [bklnrt]uir
SFX A ir í/GO [eiou]lir
SFX A ir í/GO [en]guir
SFX A ir í/GO [fiktxđ]alir
SFX A ir í/GO [ir]morir
SFX A ir í/GO [jl]estir
SFX A ir í/GO [ps]entir
SFX A ir í/GO [tv]eñir
SFX A ir í/GO arguir
SFX A ir í/GO censir
SFX A ir í/GO desavir
SFX A ir í/GO dir
SFX A ir í/GO dormir
SFX A ir í/GO ensir
SFX A ir í/GO esir
SFX A ir í/GO frir
SFX A ir í/GO mentir
SFX A ir í/GO morir
SFX A ir í/GO orir
SFX A ir í/GO salir
SFX A ir í/GO servir
SFX A ir í/GO skarmir
SFX A ir í/GO vestir
SFX A ir í/GO xmentir
SFX A ir ía/IOQ [abcfgjklmnoprstuvxñđŧ]ir
SFX A ir ía/IOQ [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir íe/I [abcfgjklmnoprstuvxñđŧ]ir
SFX A ir íe/I [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir íelo/R [abcfgjklmnoprstuvxñđŧ]ir
SFX A ir íelo/R [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir íelo/R dir
SFX A ir íi/MO [abcfgjklmnoprstuvxñđŧ]ir
SFX A ir íi/MO [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir íimo/K [abcfgjklmnoprstuvxñđŧ]ir
SFX A ir íimo/K [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir íimo/K dir
SFX A ir íimoi/L [abcfgjklmnoprstuvxñđŧ]ir
SFX A ir íimoi/L [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir íimoi/L dir
SFX A ir íitu/N [abcfgjklmnoprstuvxñđŧ]ir
SFX A ir íitu/N [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir íitu/N dir
SFX A ir ío/I [abcfgjklmnoprstuvxñđŧ]ir
SFX A ir ío/I [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir íselo/R [acdfgjknopxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir íselo/R [ae]mir
SFX A ir íselo/R [aeilou]tir
SFX A ir íselo/R [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir íselo/R [aeu]rbir
SFX A ir íselo/R [ai]nsir
SFX A ir íselo/R [ailoru]sir
SFX A ir íselo/R [aio]stir
SFX A ir íselo/R [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir íselo/R [ao]ntir
SFX A ir íselo/R [bklnrt]uir
SFX A ir íselo/R [ckmux]arir
SFX A ir íselo/R [degiptu]rir
SFX A ir íselo/R [eiou]lir
SFX A ir íselo/R [fiktxđ]alir
SFX A ir íselo/R [ft]orbir
SFX A ir íselo/R [ir]morir
SFX A ir íselo/R [jl]estir
SFX A ir íselo/R arguir
SFX A ir íselo/R censir
SFX A ir íselo/R desavir
SFX A ir íselo/R ertir
SFX A ir íselo/R orir
SFX A ir íselo/R ortir
SFX A ir íselo/R parir
SFX A ir íselo/R partir
SFX A ir íselo/R skarmir
SFX A ir íselo/R sorbir
SFX A ir íselo/R xmartir
SFX A ir íselo/R xmentir
SFX A ir ísimo [abcfgjklmnoprstuvxñđŧ]ir
SFX A ir ísimo [aeilnrux]dir
SFX A ir ísimo dir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [acdfgjknopxđŧ]ir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [ae]mir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [aeilou]tir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [aeu]rbir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [ai]nsir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [ailoru]sir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [aio]stir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [ao]ntir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [bklnrt]uir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [ckmux]arir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [degiptu]rir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [eiou]lir
SFX A ir ísitu/N [fiktxđ]alir
