public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
aidar/A
dexalborar/A
inalŧar/A
traxandar/A
ansinar/A
inarđerar/A
inarpeđar/A
astiar/A
inaŧidir/A
reaver/A
badar/A
bagolar/A
xbakanar/A
xbalanŧar/A
balordir/A
rexbalŧar/A
abandonar/A
inbaoxar/A
xbarbar/A
dexbarkar/A
rebasar/A
rebàter/A
baŧilar/A
xbavar/A
bear/A
xbekotar/A
xberlotar/A
xbeŧolar/A
biankir/A
xbiaxemar/A
konbinar/A
birar/A
biskolar/A
blokar/A
rebóɉer/A
xbokar/A
inbolponar/A
inbonir/A
bondar/A
abordar/A
xborsar/A
boteđar/A
dexboŧolar/A
bragañar/A
bramegar/A
xbrasar/A
dexbraxolar/A
dexbrigar/A
broar/A
xbroɉar/A
bronbolar/A
brunar/A
xbudelar/A
bulegar/A
dexbutar/A
xbuxetar/A
scapar/A
cavar/A
censir/A
recèñer/A
mancéñer/A
cetarar/A
descodar/A
incukar/A
predir/A
daŧiar/A
dentar/A
derokar/A
dexeñar/A
disipar/A
dixertar/A
indolentrar/A
predomenar/A
indopiar/A
dormenŧar/A
doxar/A
adular/A
reprodúxer/A
đavariar/A
đónxer/A
đovar/A
strađurar/A
ekuipaɉar/A
entrar/A
ineskar/A
examenar/A
exitar/A
likuefar/A
desfabregar/A
sfakinar/A
kontrafaliar/A
fangar/A
infarinar/A
infatuar/A
favorir/A
klasifegar/A
senplifegar/A
fenir/A
fénxer/A
referir/A
festeđar/A
arfiar/A
infiankar/A
fiaskar/A
infidar/A
desfikar/A
sfilaŧar/A
fínxer/A
sfiorir/A
fiscar/A
inafitar/A
foderar/A
infogonar/A
afolar/A
sfondrar/A
deskonfortar/A
formaliđar/A
forŧar/A
infóter/A
infrankar/A
infrapolir/A
sfratar/A
perifraxar/A
frèmer/A
fritegar/A
frontar/A
frutuar/A
fulminar/A
profumegar/A
futiñar/A
ingabanar/A
galeđar/A
ingalopar/A
ganbinar/A
garantir/A
xgarbujar/A
xgaruɉar/A
ingavasar/A
gindar/A
gòder/A
gondolar/A
xgorgonar/A
graduar/A
ingranar/A
xgranfar/A
ingrapejar/A
gravar/A
traxgredir/A
ingrespar/A
griliar/A
gritar/A
xgrixolir/A
ingrosir/A
inguar/A
gualivar/A
guañar/A
ingurar/A
exibir/A
imaxinar/A
dixinestar/A
ingrotolir/A
malinpresionar/A
insosolar/A
intiriŧir/A
inxavaskar/A
reiterar/A
jutar/A
xɉedolar/A
ɉetar/A
ɉoŧolar/A
inkabalar/A
inkaenar/A
kajar/A
kalibrar/A
kalkolar/A
skaltrir/A
kaluñar/A
deskanar/A
inkandir/A
inkankrenar/A
kanpionar/A
skantonar/A
kaparar/A
rekapitolar/A
inkapuŧar/A
inkaregar/A
skarmir/A
skaroŧar/A
karteđar/A
deskasar/A
inkastelar/A
inkatarar/A
inkatigar/A
deskaŧar/A
eskavar/A
skavalkar/A
inklúder/A
inkokar/A
inkolorar/A
komisionar/A
konfuxionar/A
rekonóser/A
kontrolar/A
koñer/A
deskórer/A
rekordar/A
korsiđar/A
inkoŧar/A
skrekolar/A
kroar/A
krovar/A
inkucar/A
interkuirar/A
inkuñar/A
skuxar/A
lanpiđar/A
latar/A
inledamar/A
aletar/A
deliberar/A
linbelar/A
logar/A
lotar/A
deluviar/A
magonar/A
remaner/A
manifestar/A
xmaraŧar/A
martoriđar/A
xmaskerar/A
maurar/A
xmeđar/A
inmenestrar/A
xmerŧiar/A
skométer/A
deminuir/A
mòjer/A
xmojar/A
xmónxer/A
moroxar/A
xmoŧar/A
mufar/A
mustacar/A
nanarar/A
denegar/A
ninolar/A
renovar/A
xñinfar/A
inoɉar/A
ondeđar/A
ordir/A
osar/A
pacolar/A
inpaɉetar/A
spaludar/A
konpaniđar/A
aparir/A
parlar/A
inpasir/A
inpastrocar/A
inpaŧar/A
peđorar/A
inpeliŧar/A
respénđer/A
inpeñar/A
perletar/A
despetar/A
inpeŧar/A
strapiantar/A
spierar/A
pionar/A
spironar/A
pixokar/A
spolinar/A
antepóner/A
desponarar/A
spontiñar/A
reportar/A
potacar/A
prèmer/A
prexentar/A
spropiar/A
despupilar/A
irabiar/A
raɉar/A
rantegar/A
ravanar/A
remar/A
rexistrar/A
riŧolir/A
interogar/A
ronkolar/A
dexroveɉar/A
rumar/A
sabolar/A
desalir/A
insalviar/A
sasar/A
scikar/A
sekolariđar/A
seguestrar/A
inselvadegir/A
malsentir/A
serbar/A
sfarŧar/A
simar/A
insíster/A
skaolar/A
skatar/A
skiŧar/A
skrinŧar/A
insoaŧar/A
solfarar/A
insoñar/A
sovraniđar/A
spear/A
insospetir/A
spionar/A
isporkar/A
restar/A
stankeđar/A
instekir/A
stitikir/A
destokolar/A
stranuar/A
strolegar/A
istuar/A
subiar/A
suparar/A
stabarar/A
atakar/A
tanbuxar/A
tarifar/A
tavernar/A
preinténder/A
tenprar/A
deteñir/A
retèñer/A
desoterar/A
pretestar/A
stirakiar/A
intonar/A
torcar/A
kontòrđer/A
protràer/A
stranbalar/A
retratar/A
tremolar/A
trinkar/A
trovar/A
stusegar/A
ŧéder/A
inŧerar/A
eŧetuar/A
ŧinganar/A
ŧokolar/A
umiliar/A
vadañar/A
revangar/A
vaŧinar/A
vejar/A
vendegar/A
deskonveñir/A
konvèñer/A
xvergolar/A
avertir/A
investigar/A
vinar/A
inviŧiar/A
invojar/A
revoltar/A
xafar/A
xbiasar/A
inxeñar/A
xironar/A
xoetar/A
